Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1205
Imposition of penalty for failure to take disciplinary action; requirements.

No collegiate athletic association shall impose a penalty on any college or university for failure to take disciplinary action against an employee or student for violation of such association's rule or legislation in violation of the due process requirements of the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 5.